Montana, session 2025, HB370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Appropriation. There is appropriated $65 million from the general fund
to the Montana highway patrol officers' retirement system pension fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1,
2025, as a one-time supplemental contribution to the highway patrol officers' retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 370